California statutes. Education Code
(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 544, Sec. 13.   (SB 1433)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------

94927.

An institution shall be considered in default of the enrollment agreement when an educational program is discontinued or canceled or the institution closes prior to completion of the educational program. When an institution is in default, student institutional charges may be refunded on a pro rata basis if the bureau determines that the school has made provision for students enrolled at the time of default to complete a comparable educational program at another institution at no additional charge to the students beyond the amount of the total charges in the original enrollment agreement. If the institution does not make that provision, a total refund of all institutional charges shall be made to students.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 310, Sec. 6.   (AB 48)   Effective January 1, 2010.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------

94927.5.

(a) Prior to closing, an institution shall provide the bureau with the following:

(1) Copies of pertinent student records, including transcripts, in hardcopy or electronic form, as determined by the bureau, pursuant to regulations adopted by the bureau.

(2) If the institution is an accredited institution, a plan for the retention of records and transcripts, approved by the institution’s accrediting agency, that provides information as to how a student may obtain a transcript or any other information about the student’s coursework and degrees completed.

(b) Subdivision (a) applies to all private postsecondary institutions, including
 institutions that are otherwise exempt from this chapter pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 94874).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 422, Sec. 7.   (SB 1492)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 16. Completion, Placement, Licensure, and Salary Disclosure Requirements [94928. - 94929.8.]

94928.

As used in this article, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) “Cohort population” means the number of students that began a program on a cohort start date.

(b) “Cohort start date” means the first class day after the cancellation period during which a cohort of students attends class for a specific program.

(c) “On-time graduates” means the number of students who complete a program within 100 percent of the published program length. An institution may separately state completion information for students completing the program within 150 percent of the original contracted time, but that information may
 not replace completion information for students completing within the original scheduled time. Completion information shall be separately stated for each campus or branch of the institution.

(d) “Graduates available for employment” means the number of graduates minus the number of graduates unavailable for employment.

(e) (1) “Graduates employed in the field” means graduates who are gainfully employed in a single position for which the institution represents the program prepares its graduates, beginning within six months after a student completes the applicable educational program. For occupations for which the state requires passing an examination, the period of employment shall begin within six months of the announcement of the examination results for the first examination available after a student completes an applicable educational program.

(2) The bureau shall define by July 1, 2014, specific measures and standards for determining whether a student is gainfully employed in a full-time or part-time position for which the institution represents the program prepares its graduates, including self-employment or conducting freelance work, and may set the standards for the hours per week and duration of employment and utilize any job classification methodology the bureau determines appropriate for this purpose, including, but not limited to, the United States Department of Labor’s Standard Occupational Classification codes.

(3) This subdivision shall not prohibit the bureau from authorizing an institution to aggregate single positions held by a graduate for purposes of meeting the hours per week standards established by the bureau.

(f) “Graduates unavailable for
 employment” means graduates who, after graduation, die, become incarcerated, are called to active military duty, are international students that leave the United States or do not have a visa allowing employment in the United States, or are continuing their education at an accredited or bureau-approved postsecondary institution.

(g) “Students available for graduation” means the cohort population minus the number of students unavailable for graduation.

(h) “Students unavailable for graduation” means students who have died, been incarcerated, or called to active military duty.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 258, Sec. 1.   (SB 410)   Effective January 1, 2016.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------

94929.

(a) An institution shall annually report to the bureau, as part of the annual report, and publish in its School Performance Fact Sheet, the completion rate for each program. Except as provided in subdivision (b), the completion rate shall be calculated by dividing the number of on-time graduates by the number of students available for graduation.

(b) In lieu of calculating graduation data pursuant to subdivision (a), an institution may report graduation data reported to, and calculated by, the Integrated Postsecondary Education Data System of the United States Department of Education.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 258, Sec. 2.   (SB 410)   Effective January 1, 2016.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------

94929.5.

(a) An institution shall annually report to the bureau, as part of the annual report, and shall publish in its School Performance Fact Sheet, all of the following:

(1) The job placement rate, calculated by dividing the number of graduates employed in the field by the number of graduates available for employment for each program that is either (1) designed, or advertised, to lead to a particular career, or (2) advertised or promoted with any claim regarding job placement.

(2) The license examination passage rates for the immediately preceding two years for programs leading to employment for which passage of a state licensing examination is required,
 calculated by dividing the number of graduates who pass the examination by the number of graduates who take the licensing examination the first time that the examination is available after completion of the educational program. The institution shall use state agency licensing data to calculate license examination passage rates. If those data are unavailable, the institution shall calculate the license examination passage rate in a manner consistent with regulations adopted by the bureau.

(3) Salary and wage information, consisting of the total number of graduates employed in the field and the annual wages or salaries of those graduates stated in increments of five thousand dollars ($5,000).

(4) If applicable, the most recent official three-year cohort default rate reported by the United States Department of Education for the institution and the percentage of enrolled students
 receiving federal student loans.

(b) Nothing in this section shall limit the bureau’s authority to collect information from an institution to comply with this section and ensure, by regulation and other lawful means, that the information required by this section, and the manner in which it is collected and reported, is all of the following:

(1) Useful to students.

(2) Useful to policymakers.

(3) Based upon the most credible and verifiable data available.

(4) Does not impose undue compliance burdens on an institution.

(c) Data and information disclosed pursuant to paragraphs (1) to (3), inclusive, of subdivision (a) is not
 required to include students who satisfy the qualifications specified in subdivision (d) of Section 94909, but an institution shall disclose on its fact sheet and to the bureau whether its data, information, or both, excludes any students pursuant to this subdivision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 840, Sec. 31.   (SB 1247)   Effective January 1, 2015.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------

94929.7.

(a) The information used to substantiate the rates and information calculated pursuant to Sections 94929 and 94929.5 shall do both of the following:

(1) Be documented and maintained by the institution for five years from the date of the publication of the rates and information.

(2) Be retained in an electronic format and made available to the bureau upon request.

(b) An institution shall provide a list of employment positions used to determine the number of graduates employed in the field for purposes of calculating job placement rates pursuant to this article.

(c) The
 bureau shall identify the specific information that an institution is required to document and maintain to substantiate rates and information pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 585, Sec. 8.   (AB 2296)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------

94929.8.

(a) On or before January 1, 2011, and pursuant to Section 94877, the bureau shall establish, by regulation, a uniform method for institutions to obtain statistically valid, current, and representative data to comply with this article.

(b) A violation of the regulations adopted pursuant to subdivision (a) is a material violation of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 310, Sec. 6.   (AB 48)   Effective January 1, 2010.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 17. Fees [94930. - 94931.5.]

94930.

(a) All fees collected pursuant to this article, including any interest on those fees, shall be deposited in the Private Postsecondary Education Administration Fund, and shall be available, upon appropriation by the Legislature, for expenditure by the bureau for the administration of this chapter.

(b) If the bureau determines by regulation that the adjustment of the fees established by this article is consistent with the intent of this chapter, the bureau may adjust the fees. However, the bureau shall not maintain a reserve balance in the Private Postsecondary Education Administration Fund in an amount that is greater than the amount necessary to fund six months of authorized operating expenses of
 the bureau in any fiscal year.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 310, Sec. 6.   (AB 48)   Effective January 1, 2010.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------

94930.5.

Subject to Section 94930, an institution shall remit to the bureau for deposit in the Private Postsecondary Education Administration Fund the following fees, in accordance with the following schedule:

(a) The following fees shall be remitted by an institution submitting an application for an approval to operate, if applicable:

(1) Application fee for an approval to operate: five thousand dollars ($5,000).

(2) Application fee for the approval to operate a new branch of the institution: three thousand dollars ($3,000).

(3) Application fee for an approval
 to operate by means of accreditation: seven hundred fifty dollars ($750).

(b) The following fees shall be remitted by an institution seeking a renewal of its approval to operate, if applicable:

(1) Renewal fee for the main campus of the institution: three thousand five hundred dollars ($3,500).

(2) Renewal fee for a branch of the institution: three thousand dollars ($3,000).

(3) Renewal fee for an institution that is approved to operate by means of accreditation: five hundred dollars ($500).

(c) The following fees shall apply to an institution seeking authorization of a substantive change to its approval to operate, if applicable:

(1) Processing fee for authorization of a substantive change to an approval to operate: five hundred dollars ($500).

(2) Processing fee in connection with a substantive change to an approval to operate by means of accreditation: two hundred fifty dollars ($250).

(d) (1) In addition to any fees paid to the bureau pursuant to subdivisions (a) to (c), inclusive, each institution that is approved to operate pursuant to this chapter shall remit both of the following:

(A) An annual fee for each campus designated by the institution as a main campus location in California, in an amount equal to 0.45 percent of the campus’ total gross revenue derived from students in California, but not to be less than two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) and not to exceed sixty thousand dollars
 ($60,000).

(B) An annual campus fee for each branch of the institution in an amount equal to 0.45 percent of the branch’s total gross revenue derived from students in California, but not to be less than two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) and not to exceed sixty thousand dollars ($60,000).

(2) The amount of the annual fees pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be proportional to the bureau’s cost of regulating institutions under this chapter, but shall not exceed seven hundred fifty thousand dollars ($750,000) for any institution.

(e) The bureau may assess both of the following fees, if applicable:

(1) An out-of-state institution registration fee in an amount of one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500).

(2) A request for inactive status fee in an amount of five hundred dollars ($500).

(f) It is the intent of the Legislature that the fees established pursuant to this section be evaluated during the 2017–18 state budget process and, if necessary, adjusted by subsequent legislation based upon information provided to the Legislature by the department and the bureau.

(g) Notwithstanding subdivision (d), effective July 1, 2018, the annual fee for each campus described in subparagraphs (A) and (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) shall be in an amount equal to 0.55 percent of that campus’ total gross revenue derived from students in California, but not to be less than two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) and not to exceed sixty thousand dollars ($60,000) for each campus.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 593, Sec. 20.   (SB 1192)   Effective January 1, 2017.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------

94931.

(a) A fee that is not paid on or before the 30th calendar day after the due date for the payment of the fee shall be subject to a 25 percent late payment penalty fee.

(b) A fee that is not paid on or before the 90th calendar day after the due date for payment of the fee shall be subject to a 35 percent late payment penalty fee.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 310, Sec. 6.   (AB 48)   Effective January 1, 2010.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------

94931.5.

(a) The bureau may propose modifications to the fee schedule in Section 94930.5 to the Governor and the Legislature to add or delete categories of fees related to work performed by the bureau and propose to the Governor and the Legislature the maximum amount to be charged for each fee category added to the fee schedule. The fee schedule shall provide adequate resources for the bureau to effectively implement this chapter.

(b) The bureau shall annually publish a schedule of the current fees to be charged pursuant to this article and shall make this schedule available to the public.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 310, Sec. 6.   (AB 48)   Effective January 1, 2010.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 18. Compliance, Enforcement, Process, and Penalties [94932. - 94945.]

94932.

The bureau shall determine an institution’s compliance with the requirements of this chapter. The bureau shall have the power to require reports that institutions shall file with the bureau in addition to the annual report, to send staff to an institution’s sites, and to require documents and responses from an institution to monitor compliance. When the bureau has reason to believe that an institution may be out of compliance, it shall conduct an investigation of the institution. If the bureau determines, after completing a compliance inspection or investigation, that an institution has violated any applicable law or regulation, the bureau shall take appropriate action pursuant to this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 593, Sec. 21.   (SB 1192)   Effective January 1, 2017.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------

94932.5.

(a) As part of its compliance program, the bureau shall perform announced and unannounced inspections of institutions at least every five years.

(b) On or before January 1, 2017, the bureau shall adopt regulations setting forth policies and practices to ensure that student protections are the highest priority of inspections and that inspections are conducted based on risk and potential harm to students. The regulations shall also set forth policies and practices for providing notice to students enrolled at an institution of the results of each inspection of the institution.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 840, Sec. 34.   (SB 1247)   Effective January 1, 2015.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------

94933.

The bureau shall provide an institution with the opportunity to remedy noncompliance, impose fines, place the institution on probation, or suspend or revoke the institution’s approval to operate, in accordance with this article, as it deems appropriate based on the severity of an institution’s violations of this chapter, and the harm that results or may result to students.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 544, Sec. 14.   (SB 1433)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------

94933.5.

As much as is practicable, the bureau shall seek to resolve instances of noncompliance, including the use of alternative dispute resolution procedures in Article 5 (commencing with Section 11420.10) of Chapter 4.5 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 310, Sec. 6.   (AB 48)   Effective January 1, 2010.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------

94934.

(a) As part of the compliance program, an institution shall submit an annual report to the bureau, under penalty of perjury, signed by a responsible corporate officer, by July 1 of each year, or another date designated by the bureau, and it shall include the following information for educational programs offered in the reporting period:

(1) The total number of students enrolled by level of degree or for a diploma.

(2) The number of degrees, by level, and diplomas awarded.

(3) The degree levels and diplomas offered.

(4) The School Performance Fact Sheet, as required pursuant to Section 94910.

(5) The school catalog, as required pursuant to Section 94909.

(6) The total charges for each educational program by period of attendance.

(7) A statement indicating whether the institution is, or is not, current in remitting Student Tuition Recovery Fund assessments.

(8) A statement indicating whether an accrediting agency has taken any final disciplinary action against the institution.

(9) Additional information deemed by the bureau to be reasonably required to ascertain compliance with this chapter.

(b) The bureau, by January 1, 2011, shall prescribe the annual report’s format and method of delivery.

(c) (1) By July 1, 2019, or another date designated by the bureau, and in each year thereafter, each institution approved to operate by the bureau, that offers specified certificates or
 degrees related to allied health professionals that require clinical training, shall include in the report submitted pursuant to subdivision (a) clinical placement data delineated by program and occupation. The report shall include all of the following:

(A) The number of students participating at each clinical training site. This shall include information about proficiency in languages other than English.

(B) Whether any donation, money, compensation, or exchange of consideration was offered or provided to the business, nonprofit, or other organization, clinic, hospital, or other location where the student was placed and, if so, the amount.

(C) The license number of each clinical training site. If the license number is not available, the report shall include the employer identification number of the clinical training site.

(2) The
 collection and reporting of findings pursuant to paragraph (1) will be implemented over multiple years, and collected by the bureau as follows:

(A) By the 2019–20 fiscal year, or another date designated by the bureau, each institution approved to
 operate by the bureau shall include in the report submitted pursuant to subdivision (a), the following allied healthcare professional degrees and certificates:

(i) Licensed Vocational Nurse.

(ii) Medical Assistant.

(iii) Occupational Therapy Aide.

(iv) Radiologic Technologist.

(v) Respiratory Care Therapist.

(vi) Pharmacy Technician and Technologist.

(vii) Surgical Technician and Technologist.

(B) By the 2020–21 fiscal year, or another date designated by the bureau,
 each institution approved to operate by the bureau shall include in the report submitted pursuant to subdivision (a), the following allied healthcare professional degrees and certificates:

(i) Cardiovascular Technologist.

(ii) Certified Nurse Assistant.

(iii) Dialysis Technician.

(iv) Diagnostic Medical Sonographer.

(v) Medical Lab Technician.

(vi) Orthopedic Assistant.

(vii) Physical Therapy Aide and Assistant.

(viii) Psychiatric Technologist.

(ix) Radiologic Therapist.

(x) Speech Language Pathology Aide.

(C) By the 2021–22 fiscal year, and in each fiscal year thereafter, each institution approved to operate by the bureau shall include in the report submitted pursuant to subdivision (a), all certificates or degrees related to allied health professionals that require clinical training.

(D) Any disclosure under this section
 shall be in compliance with state and federal privacy laws.

(E) For the purposes of this subdivision, “allied health professional” has the same meaning as in Section 295p of Title 42 of the United States Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 901, Sec. 2.   (SB 1348)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------

94934.5.

(a) An institution with an approval to operate that knows that it is being investigated by an oversight entity other than the bureau shall report that investigation, including the nature of that investigation, to the bureau in writing within 30 days of the institution’s first knowledge of the investigation. An institution with an approval to operate that is the subject of a judgment by, a regulatory action by, increased oversight or monitoring by, or a settlement with, any oversight entity other than the bureau shall report it to the bureau within 30 days. Failure to comply with this section may subject the institution to an administrative citation pursuant to Section 94936.

(b) For the purposes of this section, “investigation” means any inquiry into possible
 violations of any applicable laws or accreditation standards.

(c) For the purposes of this section, “oversight entity” means all of the following:

(1) Any governmental agency.

(2) Any accrediting agency.

(3) Any professional licensing entity that exercises any programmatic or institutional approval over the institution.

(4) Any private entity authorized pursuant to any provision of the Business and Professions Code to approve schools or educational programs for purposes of a professional certification.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 197, Sec. 9.   (AB 1504)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------

94935.

(a) Bureau staff who, during an inspection of an institution, detect a violation of this chapter, or regulations adopted pursuant to this chapter, that is a minor violation as determined by the bureau, pursuant to regulations adopted by January 1, 2011, shall issue a notice to comply at the conclusion of the inspection. The bureau shall establish a voluntary informal appeal process, by regulation, within one year of the enactment of this chapter.

(b) An institution that receives a notice to comply shall have no more than 30 days from the date of inspection to remedy the noncompliance.

(c) Upon achieving compliance,
 the institution shall sign and return the notice to comply to the bureau.

(d) A single notice to comply shall be issued listing separately all the minor violations cited during the inspection.

(e) A notice to comply shall not be issued for any minor violation that is corrected before the conclusion of the inspection. Immediate compliance may be noted in the inspection report, but the institution shall not be subject to any further action by the bureau.

(f) A notice to comply shall be the only means the bureau shall use to cite a minor violation discovered during an inspection. The bureau shall not take any other enforcement action specified in this chapter against an institution that has received a notice to comply
 if the institution remedies the violation within 30 days from the date of the inspection.

(g) If an institution that receives a notice to comply pursuant to subdivision (a) disagrees with one or more of the alleged minor violations listed in the notice to comply, an institution shall send the bureau a written notice of disagreement. The agency may take administrative enforcement action to seek compliance with the requirements of the notice to comply.

(h) If an institution fails to comply with a notice to comply within the prescribed time, the bureau shall take appropriate administrative enforcement action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 544, Sec. 16.   (SB 1433)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------

94936.

(a) As a consequence of an investigation, which may incorporate any materials obtained or produced in connection with a compliance inspection, and upon a finding that the institution has committed a violation of this chapter or that the institution has failed to comply with a notice to comply pursuant to Section 94935, the bureau shall issue a citation to an institution for violation of this chapter, or regulations adopted pursuant to this chapter.

(b) The citation may contain any of the following:

(1) An order of abatement that may require an institution to demonstrate how future compliance with this chapter or regulations adopted
 pursuant to this chapter will be accomplished.

(2) Notwithstanding Section 125.9 of the Business and Professions Code, an administrative fine not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000) for each violation. The bureau shall base its assessment of the administrative fine on:

(A) The nature and seriousness of the violation.

(B) The persistence of the violation.

(C) The good faith of the institution.

(D) The history of previous violations.

(E) The purposes of this chapter.

(F) The potential harm to students.

(3) An order to compensate students for harm that resulted or may have resulted, including a refund of moneys paid to the institution by or on behalf of the student, as determined by the bureau.

(c) (1) The citation shall be in writing and describe the nature of the violation and the specific provision of law or regulation that is alleged to have been violated.

(2) The citation shall inform the institution of its right to request a hearing in writing within 30 days from service of the citation.

(3) If a hearing is requested, the bureau shall select an informal hearing pursuant to Article 10 (commencing
 with Section 11445.10) of Chapter 4.5 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code or a formal hearing pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(4) If a hearing is not requested, payment of the administrative fine is due 30 days from the date of service, and shall not constitute an admission of the violation charged.

(5) If a hearing is conducted and payment of an administrative fine is ordered, the administrative fine is due 30 days from when the final order is entered.

(6) The bureau may enforce the administrative fine as if it were a money judgment pursuant to Title 9 (commencing with Section 680.010) of Part 2 of the Code of
 Civil Procedure.

(d) All administrative fines shall be deposited in the Private Postsecondary Education Administration Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 544, Sec. 17.   (SB 1433)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------

94937.

(a) As a consequence of an investigation, which may incorporate any materials obtained or produced in connection with a compliance inspection, and upon a finding that an institution has committed a violation, the bureau may place an institution on probation or may suspend or revoke an institution’s approval to operate for:

(1) Obtaining an approval to operate by fraud.

(2) A material violation or repeated violations of this chapter or regulations adopted pursuant to this chapter that have resulted, or may result, in harm to students. For purposes of this paragraph, “material violation” includes, but is not limited to, misrepresentation, fraud in the inducement of a contract, and false or misleading
 claims or advertising, upon which a student reasonably relied in executing an enrollment agreement and that resulted, or may result, in harm to the student.

(b) The bureau shall adopt regulations, within one year of the enactment of this chapter, governing probation and suspension of an approval to operate.

(c) The bureau may seek reimbursement pursuant to Section 125.3 of the Business and Professions Code.

(d) An institution shall not be required to pay the cost of investigation to more than one agency.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 552, Sec. 10.   (SB 802)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------

94938.

(a) If the bureau determines that it needs to make an emergency decision to protect students, prevent misrepresentation to the public, or prevent the loss of public funds or moneys paid by students, it may do so pursuant to Article 13 (commencing with Section 11460.10) of Chapter 4.5 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(b) The bureau shall, by January 1, 2011, adopt regulations to give this section effect pursuant to Section 11460.20 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 310, Sec. 6.   (AB 48)   Effective January 1, 2010.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------

94939.

(a) The bureau may bring an action for equitable relief for any violation of this chapter. The equitable relief may include restitution, a temporary restraining order, the appointment of a receiver, and a preliminary or permanent injunction. The action may be brought in the county in which the defendant resides or in which any violation has occurred or may occur.

(b) The remedies provided in this section supplement, and do not supplant, the remedies and penalties under other provisions of law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 310, Sec. 6.   (AB 48)   Effective January 1, 2010.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------

94940.

As consequence of an adverse administrative action against an institution, the institution may request a hearing pursuant to Article 10 (commencing with Section 11445.10) of Chapter 4.5 or Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 310, Sec. 6.   (AB 48)   Effective January 1, 2010.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------

94941.

(a) An individual who has cause to believe that an institution has violated this chapter, or regulations adopted pursuant to this chapter, may file a complaint with the bureau against the institution. The complaint shall set forth the alleged violation, and shall contain any other information as may be required by the bureau.

(b) To ensure that the bureau’s resources are maximized for the protection of the public, the bureau, in consultation with the advisory committee, shall establish priorities for its inspections and other investigative and enforcement resources to ensure that institutions representing the greatest threat of harm to the greatest number of students are identified and disciplined by the bureau or referred to the Attorney General.

(c) In developing its priorities for inspection, investigation, and enforcement regarding institutions, the bureau shall consider as posing heightened risks the characteristics of the following institutions:

(1) An institution that receives significant public resources, including an institution that receives more than 70 percent of its revenues from federal financial aid, state financial aid, financial aid for veterans, and other public student aid funds.

(2) An institution with a large number of students defaulting on their federal loans, including an institution with a three-year cohort default rate above 15.5 percent.

(3) An institution with reported placement rates, completion rates, or licensure rates in an educational program that are far higher or
 lower than comparable educational institutions or programs.

(4) An institution that experiences a dramatic increase in enrollment, recently expanded educational programs or campuses, or recently consolidated campuses.

(5) An institution that offers only nonremedial educational program courses in English, but enrolls students with limited or no English language proficiency.

(6) An institution that has experienced a recent change of ownership or control, or a change in the business organization of the institution.

(7) An institution with audited financial statements that do not satisfy the bureau’s requirements for financial stability.

(8) An institution that has recently been the subject of
 an investigation, judgment, or regulatory action by, or a settlement with, a governmental agency.

(9) An institution that experiences institutional or programmatic accreditation restriction by an accreditor, government restriction of, or injunction against, its approval to operate, or placement on cash-reimbursement or heightened monitoring status by the United States Department of Education.

(d) The bureau shall indicate in an annual report, to be made publicly available on its internet website, the number of temporary restraining orders, interim suspension orders, and disciplinary actions taken by the bureau, disaggregated by each priority category established pursuant to subdivision (b).

(e) The bureau shall, in consultation with the advisory committee, adopt regulations to establish categories of complaints or
 cases that are to be handled on a priority basis. The priority complaints or cases shall include, but not be limited to, those alleging unlawful, unfair or fraudulent business acts or practices, including unfair, deceptive, untrue, or misleading statements, including all statements made or required to be made pursuant to the requirements of this chapter, related to any of the following:

(1) Degrees, educational programs, or internships offered, the appropriateness of available equipment for a program, or the qualifications or experience of instructors.

(2) Job placement, graduation, time to complete an educational program, or educational program or graduation requirements.

(3) Loan eligibility, terms, whether the loan is federal or private, or default or forbearance rates.

(4) Passage rates on licensing or certification examinations or whether an institution’s degrees or educational programs provide students with the necessary qualifications to take these exams and qualify for professional licenses or certifications.

(5) Cost of an educational program, including fees and other nontuition charges.

(6) Affiliation with or endorsement by any government agency, or by any organization or agency related to the Armed Forces, including, but not limited to, groups representing veterans.

(7) Terms of withdrawal and refunds from an institution.

(8) Payment of bonuses, commissions, or other incentives offered by an institution to its employees or
 contractors.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 510, Sec. 102.   (SB 887)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------

94942.

(a) The bureau shall establish a toll-free telephone number staffed by a bureau employee by which a student or a member of the public may file a complaint under this chapter.

(b) The bureau shall make a complaint form available on its internet website. The bureau shall permit students and members of the public to file a complaint under this chapter through the bureau’s internet website.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 510, Sec. 103.   (SB 887)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------

94943.

The following violations of this chapter are public offenses:

(a) Knowingly operating a private postsecondary institution without an approval to operate is an infraction subject to the procedures described in Sections 19.6 and 19.7 of the Penal Code.

(b) Knowingly providing false information to the bureau on an application for an approval to operate is an infraction subject to the procedures described in Sections 19.6 and 19.7 of the Penal Code.

(c) Knowingly submitting, to the bureau, false information that is required to be reported pursuant to Article 16 (commencing with Section 94928) is an
 infraction subject to the procedures described in Sections 19.6 and 19.7 of the Penal Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 310, Sec. 6.   (AB 48)   Effective January 1, 2010.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------

94943.5.

An institution shall designate and maintain an agent for service of process within this state, and provide the name, address, and telephone number of the agent to the bureau. The bureau shall furnish the agent’s name, address, and telephone number to a person upon request.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 310, Sec. 6.   (AB 48)   Effective January 1, 2010.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------

94944.
